Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2804
Property; unpaid taxes; sale; notice; procedure if no bid is made.

The county treasurer shall, prior to the sale, cause an advertisement to be printed in a legal newspaper published in the English language in such county or, if none is published in the county, in such a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county at least once a week for three consecutive weeks. Such advertisement shall state the owner of such property and that such property, described by its legal description and if within a city or village by its street address in addition to its legal description, will be sold to the highest bidder on the date set for sale and that a title clear of all liens for taxes, or special assessments and interest, penalties, or costs thereon will be conveyed. If upon the date of sale no bid is made, the county treasurer shall continue such sale until a bid shall have been received, except that the owner, at any time after the date for sale, may cause the selling of the property to be discontinued by notifying the county treasurer of such desire.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 4, p. 1496;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 40.